Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201344-1307
Request for external review; exhaustion
of internal grievance process; request for expedited external review of adverse
determination; independent review organization; duties.

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection
(2) of this section, a request for an external review pursuant to section
44-1308, 44-1309, or 44-1310 shall not be made until the covered person has
exhausted the health carrier's internal grievance process as set forth in
the Health Carrier Grievance Procedure Act.

(b) A covered person shall
be considered to have exhausted the health carrier's internal grievance process
for purposes of this section if the covered person or the covered person's
authorized representative:

(i)
Has filed a grievance involving an adverse determination pursuant to section
44-7308; and

(ii)
Except to the extent that the covered person or the covered person's authorized
representative requested or agreed to a delay, has not received a written
decision on the grievance from the health carrier within thirty days following
the date that the covered person or the covered person's authorized representative
filed the grievance with the health carrier.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (1)(b)
of this section, a covered person or the covered person's authorized representative
may not make a request for an external review of an adverse determination
involving a retrospective review determination made pursuant to the Utilization
Review Act until the covered person has exhausted the health carrier's internal
grievance process.

(2)(a)(i)
At the same time that a covered person or the covered person's authorized
representative files a request for an expedited review of a grievance involving
an adverse determination as set forth in section 44-7311, the covered person
or his or her authorized representative may file a request for an expedited
external review of the adverse determination:

(A) Under section 44-1309 if the
covered person has a medical condition in which the timeframe for completion
of an expedited review of the grievance involving an adverse determination
set forth in section 44-7311 would seriously jeopardize the life or health
of the covered person or would jeopardize the covered person's ability to
regain maximum function; or

(B) Under section 44-1310 if the adverse determination
involves a denial of coverage based upon a determination that the recommended
or requested health care service or treatment is experimental or investigational
and the covered person's treating physician certifies in writing that the
recommended or requested health care service or treatment that is the subject
of the adverse determination would be significantly less effective if not
promptly initiated.

(ii)
Upon receipt of a request for an expedited external review under subdivision
(2)(a)(i) of this section, the independent review organization conducting
the external review in accordance with the provisions of section 44-1309 or
44-1310 shall determine whether the covered person shall be required to complete
the expedited grievance review process set forth in section 44-7311 before
it conducts the expedited external review.

(iii) Upon a determination made pursuant to subdivision
(2)(a)(ii) of this section that the covered person must first complete the
expedited grievance review process set forth in section 44-7311, the independent
review organization shall immediately notify the covered person and, if applicable,
the covered person's authorized representative of such determination and the
fact that it will not proceed with the expedited external review set forth
in section 44-1309 until completion of the expedited grievance review process
and the covered person's grievance at the completion of the expedited grievance
review process remains unresolved.

(b) A request for an external review of an adverse
determination may be made before the covered person has exhausted the health
carrier's internal grievance procedures as set forth in section 44-7308 if
the health carrier agrees to waive the exhaustion requirement.

(3) If the requirement
to exhaust the health carrier's internal grievance procedures is waived under
subdivision (2)(b) of this section, the covered person or the covered person's
authorized representative may file a request in writing for a standard external
review as set forth in section 44-1308 or 44-1310.

Laws 2013, LB147, § 7.
September 6, 2013
Health Carrier Grievance Procedure Act, see section 44-7301.